Utah statutes.
59-2-216.   Commission to furnish list of patented lands to county
assessors.
The commission shall furnish the county assessors, annually, by February 1:
(1)  a list of all patents of lands, except patents for mining locations, and
all lands for which receivers' final receipts have been issued for which
patents have not been issued, not previously reported;
(2)  a certified list of all lands that have been sold by the state for which
certificates of purchase or patents have been issued during the preceding
year, with a description, together with the names of the purchasers or
patentees; and
(3)  a list containing a description of the lands sold by the state during the
preceding year upon contracts for purchase, together with the names and
addresses of the purchasers where known, the amount of the purchase price, and
the total amount paid or due on the preceding January 1.
